Tennessee, session 114, SB2627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 10, Part 14, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) By July 1, 2026, and by each July 1 thereafter, the department of education
shall provide a report to the chairs of the finance, ways, and means committees of the
senate and house of representatives, the chairs of the education committees of the
senate and house of representatives, and the directors of the office of legislative budget
analysis to assist the general assembly in evaluating the availability of the program.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), the report must include the following
information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(1) The number of:
(A) Eligible students statewide;
(B) Participating students; and
(C) Students the program had the capacity to serve; and
(2) The process developed and implemented by the department to notify
parents of their child's potential eligibility to participate in the program.
(c) The first report provided by the department pursuant to this section must
include the information identified in subsection (b) for each of the five (5) immediately
preceding fiscal years, as well as the total annual amount expended by the department
for the program for each of the five (5) immediately preceding years.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2627
008964
- 1 -